Utah statutes.
53A-17a-165.   Enhancement for Accelerated Students Program.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall distribute money appropriated for the Enhancement for Accelerated Students Program to school districts and charter schools according to a formula adopted by the State Board of Education, after consultation with school districts and charter schools.

(2)  A distribution formula adopted under Subsection (1) may include an allocation of money for:

(a)  advanced placement courses;

(b)  gifted and talented programs, including professional development for teachers of high ability students; and

(c)  International Baccalaureate programs.

(3)  The greater of 1.5% or $100,000 of the appropriation for the Enhancement for Accelerated Students Program may be allowed for International Baccalaureate programs.

(4)  A school district or charter school shall use money distributed under this section to enhance the academic growth of students whose academic achievement is accelerated.

(5)  The State Board of Education shall develop performance criteria to measure the effectiveness of the Enhancement for Accelerated Students Program and make an annual report to the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee on the effectiveness of the program.

